District of Columbia statutes.
24-221.05

Reporting requirement.

The Department shall regularly inform inmates of all awards, forfeitures, and restorations of good time credits, and shall inform the Board of Parole of all persons who are expected to become eligible for release on parole within 45 days of their eligibility date, and shall inform the Board of Parole of all persons whose release on parole will become mandatory within 45 days of the date when their release on parole becomes mandatory.

Apr. 11, 1987, D.C. Law 6-218, § 7, 34 DCR 484

History

1981 Ed., § 24-433.

Prior Codifications